Mississippi, session 2026, HB1441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 61-3-65, Mississippi Code of 1972: 61-3-65.  Abandoned Motor Vehicles on Airport Property. (1)  Any airport authority created pursuant to Section 61-3-1 et seq., is authorized and empowered to take possession of any motor vehicle that has been abandoned and left upon property owned, operated, or controlled by the airport authority when the owner of the motor vehicle cannot be located or after proper notice as provided in this section. (2)  Before taking title to an abandoned motor vehicle under this section, the airport authority shall: (a)  Make reasonable efforts to determine the name and address of the last registered owner of the vehicle and any lienholders of record; (b)  Send written notice, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the registered owner and any lienholders advising that the vehicle has been deemed abandoned, is subject to sale, and will be disposed of unless claimed and all towing, storage, and related charges are paid within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice; and (c)  Cause a notice of abandonment to be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the vehicle is located at least ten (10) days before the date of the sale or other disposition. (3)  If the vehicle is not claimed and all charges are not paid within the required time, title to the vehicle shall vest in the airport authority, and the authority may: (a)  Sell the vehicle at public auction to the highest and best bidder for cash; (b)  Otherwise dispose of the vehicle in a commercially reasonable manner; or (c)  Retain the vehicle for official airport use, including, but not limited to, airfield maintenance, security, operations, or other authorized governmental purposes. (4)  The proceeds of any sale under this section shall be applied: (a)  First, to the costs of towing, storage, notice, and sale; and (b)  Any remaining balance shall be held for the owner of record for ninety (90) days.  If unclaimed after that time, the balance shall be deposited into the general operating fund of the airport authority. (5)  The authority granted under this section is supplemental to, and does not limit, any other rights or remedies available to airport authorities under state law for the removal or disposition of abandoned vehicles. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force upon passage.